Utah statutes.
63G-6a-107.   Exemptions from chapter -- Compliance with federal law.

(1)  Except for Part 23, Unlawful Conduct and Penalties, the provisions of this chapter are not applicable to:

(a)  funds administered under the Percent-for-Art Program of the Utah Percent-for-Art Act;

(b)  grants awarded by the state or contracts between the state and any of the following:

(i)  an educational procurement unit;

(ii)  a conservation district;

(iii)  a local building authority;

(iv)  a local district;

(v)  a public corporation;

(vi)  a special service district;

(vii)  a public transit district; or

(viii)  two or more of the entities described in Subsections (1)(b)(i) through (vii), acting under legislation that authorizes intergovernmental cooperation;

(c)  medical supplies or medical equipment, including service agreements for medical equipment, obtained through a purchasing consortium by the Utah State Hospital, the Utah State Developmental Center, the University of Utah Hospital, or any other hospital owned by the state or a political subdivision of the state, if:

(i)  the consortium uses a competitive procurement process; and

(ii)  the chief administrative officer of the hospital makes a written finding that the prices for purchasing medical supplies and medical equipment through the consortium are competitive with market prices;

(d)  goods purchased for resale; or

(e)  any action taken by a majority of both houses of the Legislature.

(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the provisions of Part 23, Unlawful Conduct and Penalties, are not applicable to an entity described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii), (iii), (iv), (vi), (vii), or (viii).

(b)  This chapter does not prevent a procurement unit from complying with the terms and conditions of any grant, gift, or bequest that is otherwise consistent with law.

(3)  Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of this chapter, when a procurement involves the expenditure of federal assistance, federal contract funds, local matching funds, or federal financial participation funds, the procurement unit shall comply with mandatory applicable federal law and regulations not reflected in this chapter.

(4)  This chapter does not supersede the requirements for retention or withholding of construction proceeds and release of construction proceeds as provided in Section 13-8-5.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

